apertium-en-es.en.metadix
    <pardef n="bab/y__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which remove -y and add -ies or directly add -s (LR)">
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ies</l>
          <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="MG: és normatiu?">
        <p>
          <l>ys</l>
          <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ies'</l>
          <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ys'</l>
          <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="analys/is__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which remove -is and add -es">
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is'</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es'</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="necropol/is__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which remove -is and add -eis">
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eis</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is'</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eis'</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>es'</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="maxim/um__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which remove -um and add -a or directly add -s (LR)">
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ums</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ums'</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bacteri/um__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which remove -um and add -a">
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mon/ey__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which add -s or remove -y and add -ies (LR)">
        <p>
          <l>ey</l>
          <r>ey<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eys</l>
          <r>ey<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ies</l>
          <r>ey<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>eys'</l>
          <r>ey<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ies'</l>
          <r>ey<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/an__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which remove -man and add -men">
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bass__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which end in -ss and add -es or nothing (LR)">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>es'</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bus__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which end in -s and add -es or -ses (LR)">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ses</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>es'</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ses'</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="politics__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns that remain the same in plural">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>'s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>'</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="wol/f__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns that remove -f and add -ves or -s(EEUU; LR)">
        <p>
          <l>f</l>
          <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ves</l>
          <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ves'</l>
          <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>fs</l>
          <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="li/fe__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns that remove -fe and add -ves">
        <p>
          <l>fe</l>
          <r>fe<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ves</l>
          <r>fe<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ves'</l>
          <r>fe<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="p/erson__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which remove -erson and add eople or directly add -s (LR; formal/legal English mainly)">
        <p>
          <l>erson</l>
          <r>erson<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eople</l>
          <r>erson<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ersons</l>
          <r>erson<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ephemeri/s__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>des</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>des'</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

      <e lm="person of action"><i>p</i><par n="p/erson__n"/>      <p>        <l><b/>of<b/>action</l><r><g><b/>of<b/>action</g></r></p></e>
	<e lm="deceitful salesman" a="eleka"><i>deceitful<b/>salesm</i><par n="m/an__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Turkish"><i>Turkish</i><par n="politics__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="atrocity"><i>atrocit</i><par n="bab/y__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="bacterium"><i>bacteri</i><par n="bacteri/um__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="millenium"><i>milleni</i><par n="bacteri/um__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="bus"><i>bus</i><par n="bus__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="person, people"><i>p</i><par n="p/erson__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="crisis"><i>cris</i><par n="analys/is__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="embassy"><i>embass</i><par n="bab/y__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="fish"><i>fish</i><par n="bass__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="herpes"><i>herpes</i><par n="politics__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="knife"><i>kni</i><par n="li/fe__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="leaf"><i>lea</i><par n="wol/f__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="life"><i>li</i><par n="li/fe__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="man"><i>m</i><par n="m/an__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="maximum"><i>maxim</i><par n="maxim/um__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="mentality"><i>mentalit</i><par n="bab/y__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="midwife"><i>midwi</i><par n="li/fe__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="minimum"><i>minim</i><par n="maxim/um__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="oasis"><i>oas</i><par n="analys/is__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="scabies"><i>scabies</i><par n="politics__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="scoliosis"><i>scolios</i><par n="analys/is__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="U.S. Secretary of State"><i>U.S.<b/>Secretar</i><par n="bab/y__n"/><p><l><b/>of<b/>State</l><r><g><b/>of<b/>State</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="shelf"><i>shel</i><par n="wol/f__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="gunman"><i>gunm</i><par n="m/an__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="handkerchief"><i>handkerchie</i><par n="wol/f__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="money"><i>mon</i><par n="mon/ey__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="wife"><i>wi</i><par n="li/fe__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="bonus"><i>bonus</i><par n="bass__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="diagnosis" a="carmentano"><i>diagnos</i><par n="analys/is__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="electrotechnics"><i>electrotechnics</i><par n="politics__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="homology"><i>homolog</i><par n="bab/y__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="saltworks"><i>saltworks</i><par n="politics__n"/>     </e>
<e lm="werewolf"><i>werewol</i><par n="wol/f__n"/>    </e>
<e lm="fisherwoman"><i>fisherwom</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
    <e lm="marquess"><i>marquess</i><par n="bass__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jellyfish" a="greenbreen"><i>jellyfish</i><par n="bass__n"/></e>
    <e lm="turkey" a="greenbreen"><i>turk</i><par n="mon/ey__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dwarf" a="greenbreen"><i>dwar</i><par n="wol/f__n"/></e>
    <e lm="monkey" a="greenbreen"><i>monk</i><par n="mon/ey__n"/></e>
    <e lm="penknife" a="greenbreen"><i>penkni</i><par n="li/fe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hospitality industry" a="greenbreen"><i>hospitality<b/>industr</i><par n="bab/y__n"/></e>
    <e lm="congressman" a="greenbreen"><i>congressm</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
    <e lm="semi-major axis" r="LR" a="greenbreen"><p><l>semimajor<b/>ax</l><r>semi-major<b/>ax</r></p><par n="analys/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stratum" a="greenbreen"><i>strat</i><par n="maxim/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ephemeris" a="greenbreen"><i>ephemeri</i><par n="ephemeri/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="statistical mechanics" a="greenbreen"><i>statistical<b/>mechanics</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
    <e lm="photosynthesis" a="greenbreen"><i>photosynthes</i><par n="analys/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="inbox" a="imaxinsoftware"><i>inbox</i><par n="bass__n"/></e>
    <e lm="assiduousness" a="imaxinsoftware"><i>assiduousness</i><par n="bass__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rectum" a="imaxinsoftware"><i>rect</i><par n="maxim/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="caecum" r="LR" a="imaxinsoftware"><p><l>cec</l><r>caec</r></p><par n="maxim/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="caecum" alt="en_US" r="RL" a="imaxinsoftware"><p><l>cec</l><r>caec</r></p><par n="maxim/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="elf" a="imaxinsoftware"><i>el</i><par n="wol/f__n"/></e>
    <e lm="young man"><i>young<b/>m</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cellulitis"><i>celluliti</i><par n="ephemeri/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rhinitis"><i>rhiniti</i><par n="ephemeri/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="necropolis"><i>necropol</i><par n="necropol/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="exegesis"><i>exeges</i><par n="analys/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="verticality"><i>verticalit</i><par n="bab/y__n"/></e>
